Maryland, session 2026, SB0446.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–310.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0446*

SENATE BILL 446
(2) (i) “Resale” means the second or subsequent sale of a ticket.
(ii) “Resale” includes a sale by any means, including in person, by
telephone, by mail, by e–mail, by facsimile, or through a website or other electronic means.
(3) “Reseller” means a person engaged in the resale of tickets.
(4) “Secondary ticket exchange” means an electronic marketplace that
enables a person to sell, purchase, and resell tickets.
(5) (i) “Speculative ticket” means a ticket that is not in the actual or
constructive possession of a reseller at the time of sale, advertisement, or listing.
(ii) “Speculative ticket” includes a ticket sold by a reseller that, at
the time of resale:
1. Is not in the physical possession of the reseller;
2. Is not owned by the reseller; or
3. Is not under contract to be transferred to the reseller.
(6) “Ticket” means physical, electronic, or other evidence, that grants the
possessor of the evidence license to enter a place of entertainment for one or more events
at a specified date and time.
(7) (i) “Ticket issuer” means a person that, directly or indirectly, issues
initial tickets for an entertainment event.
(ii) “Ticket issuer” includes:
1. A musician or musical group;
2. An operator of a venue;
3. A sponsor or a promoter of an entertainment event;
4. A sports team participating in an entertainment event;
5. A sports league whose teams are participating in an
entertainment event;
6. A theater company;
7. A marketplace operated for consumers to make an initial
purchase of tickets; or

SENATE BILL 446 3
8. An agent of any of the persons listed in items 1 through 7
of this subparagraph.
(b) (1) This subsection applies only to secondary ticket exchanges, ticket
issuers, and resellers.
(2) The listing for a ticket and each step of a transaction to purchase a
ticket shall:
(i) Clearly and conspicuously disclose the total price of the ticket,
including all fees [and taxes] other than shipping costs that are not determinable at a step
in the transaction;
(ii) Provide an itemized listing of all charges that comprise the total
price of the ticket, including all fees [and taxes]; and
(iii) Identify the seat number and zone or section of the ticket, to the
extent applicable to the seat and venue.
(3) (i) The total price of a ticket under paragraph (2)(i) of this
subsection may be increased in a noninitial step of a transaction by the amount of
reasonable shipping costs for physically delivered tickets.
(ii) The shipping costs allowed under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph may vary with the purchaser’s location relative to the shipment’s location of
origin and the delivery method selected by the purchaser.
(iii) The total price of the ticket, including all fees[, taxes,] and
shipping costs, shall be clearly and conspicuously disclosed prior to final purchase of the
ticket.
(c) A reseller may not sell or offer to sell speculative tickets.
(d) A secondary ticket exchange may not provide a marketplace for the sale or
resale of a ticket that violates this section.
(e) A ticket issuer, secondary ticket exchange, or reseller who directly engages in
a sales transaction with a purchaser for the purchase of a ticket shall provide the purchaser
with a full refund of the total amount paid, including the price of the ticket and any fees
and taxes, if:
(1) The ticket purchased is counterfeit;
(2) The event for which the ticket is purchased is canceled; or
(3) The ticket fails to conform to the description as advertised or
represented to the purchaser by the seller.

SENATE BILL 446
(F) (1) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER ACTION AUTHORIZED BY THIS TITLE
OR OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED BY LAW, A CONSUMER, AN ARTIST, OR A VENUE THAT
HAS BEEN DIRECTLY AGGRIEVED BY A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION MAY BRING AN
ACTION UNDER § 13–408 OF THIS TITLE AGAINST THE TICKET ISSUER, SECONDARY
TICKET EXCHANGE, OR RESELLER THAT VIOLATED THIS SECTION.
(2) IF A PERSON PREVAILS IN AN ACTION FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS
SECTION, THE COURT MAY, IN ADDITION TO ANY RELIEF STATED UNDER § 13–408 OF
THIS TITLE, AWARD ECONOMIC AND PUNITIVE DAMAGES AS FOLLOWS:
(I) FOR A FIRST VIOLATION BY A TICKET ISSUER, SECONDARY
TICKET EXCHANGE, OR RESELLER, TOTAL DAMAGES NOT EXCEEDING $10,000; AND
(II) FOR A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION BY THE SAME
TICKET ISSUER, SECONDARY TICKET EXCHANGE, OR RESELLER, TOTAL DAMAGES
NOT EXCEEDING $25,000 FOR EACH VIOLATION.
13–408.
(a) In addition to any action by the Division or Attorney General authorized by
this title and any other action otherwise authorized by law, any person may bring an action
to recover for injury or loss sustained by him as the result of a practice prohibited by this
title.
(b) Any person who brings an action to recover for injury or loss under this section
and who is awarded damages may also seek, and the court may award, reasonable
attorney’s fees.
(c) If it appears to the satisfaction of the court, at any time, that an action is
brought in bad faith or is of a frivolous nature, the court may order the offending party to
pay to the other party reasonable attorney’s fees.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a person may not bring
an action under this section to recover for injuries sustained as a result of the professional
services provided by a health care provider, as defined in § 3–2A–01 of the Courts Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.